Illinois, session 104th, HB3416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 2-17 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/2-17)  (from Ch. 37, par. 802-17)7    Sec. 2-17. Guardian ad litem. 8    (1) Immediately upon the filing of a petition alleging 9that the minor is a person described in Sections 2-3 or 2-4 of 10this Article, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for 11the minor if:12        (a) such petition alleges that the minor is an abused 13    or neglected child; or14        (b) such petition alleges that charges alleging the 15    commission of any of the sex offenses defined in Article 16    11 or in Sections 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 17    11-1.60, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15 or 12-16 of the 18    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, have 19    been filed against a defendant in any court and that such 20    minor is the alleged victim of the acts of the defendant in 21    the commission of such offense.22    Unless the guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this 23paragraph (1) is an attorney at law, the guardian ad litem   HB3416- 2 -LRB104 10753 RLC 20832 b1shall be represented in the performance of the guardian ad 2litem's duties by counsel. The guardian ad litem shall 3represent the best interests of the minor and shall present 4recommendations to the court consistent with that duty.5    (2) Before proceeding with the hearing, the court shall 6appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor if: 7        (a) no parent, guardian, custodian or relative of the 8    minor appears at the first or any subsequent hearing of 9    the case;10        (b) the petition prays for the appointment of a 11    guardian with power to consent to adoption; or12        (c) the petition for which the minor is before the 13    court resulted from a report made pursuant to the Abused 14    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.15    (3) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor 16whenever it finds that there may be a conflict of interest 17between the minor and the minor's parents or other custodian 18or that it is otherwise in the minor's best interest to do so.19    (4) Unless the guardian ad litem is an attorney, the 20guardian ad litem shall be represented by counsel.21    (4.5) Pursuant to Section 6b-1 of the Children and Family 22Services Act, the Department of Children and Family Services 23must maintain the name, electronic mail address, and telephone 24number for each minor's court-appointed guardian ad litem and, 25if applicable, the guardian ad litem's supervisor. The 26Department of Children and Family Services must update this   HB3416- 3 -LRB104 10753 RLC 20832 b1contact information within 5 days of receiving notice of a 2change. The Advocacy Office for Children and Families, 3established pursuant to Section 5e of the Children and Family 4Services Act, must make this contact information available to 5the minor, current foster parent or caregiver, or caseworker, 6if requested. 7    (5) The reasonable fees of a guardian ad litem appointed 8under this Section shall be fixed by the court and charged to 9the parents of the minor, to the extent they are able to pay. 10If the parents are unable to pay those fees, they shall be paid 11from the general fund of the county.12    (6) A guardian ad litem appointed under this Section, 13shall receive copies of any and all classified reports of 14child abuse and neglect made under the Abused and Neglected 15Child Reporting Act in which the minor who is the subject of a 16report under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, is 17also the minor for whom the guardian ad litem is appointed 18under this Section.19    (6.5) A guardian ad litem appointed under this Section or 20attorney appointed under this Act shall receive a copy of each 21significant event report that involves the minor no later than 223 days after the Department learns of an event requiring a 23significant event report to be written, or earlier as required 24by Department rule. 25    (7) The appointed guardian ad litem shall remain the 26minor's guardian ad litem throughout the entire juvenile trial   HB3416- 4 -LRB104 10753 RLC 20832 b1court proceedings, including permanency hearings and 2termination of parental rights proceedings, unless there is a 3substitution entered by order of the court. A parent may 4request one substitution of a guardian ad litem during the 5entire juvenile court proceedings, upon request to the judge. 6The judge shall review the request and grant the substitution 7if the judge finds that the parent has good cause for believing 8that the guardian ad litem is not fulfilling his or her duties. 9    (8) The guardian ad litem or an agent of the guardian ad 10litem shall have a minimum of one in-person contact with the 11minor and one contact with one of the current foster parents or 12caregivers prior to the adjudicatory hearing, and at least one 13additional in-person contact with the child and one contact 14with one of the current foster parents or caregivers after the 15adjudicatory hearing but prior to the first permanency hearing 16and one additional in-person contact with the child and one 17contact with one of the current foster parents or caregivers 18each subsequent year. For good cause shown, the judge may 19excuse face-to-face interviews required in this subsection.20    (9) In counties with a population of 100,000 or more but 21less than 3,000,000, each guardian ad litem must successfully 22complete a training program approved by the Department of 23Children and Family Services. The Department of Children and 24Family Services shall provide training materials and documents 25to guardians ad litem who are not mandated to attend the 26training program. The Department of Children and Family   HB3416- 5 -LRB104 10753 RLC 20832 b1Services shall develop and distribute to all guardians ad 2litem a bibliography containing information including but not 3limited to the juvenile court process, termination of parental 4rights, child development, medical aspects of child abuse, 5effects of trauma and household domestic violence on children 6and teens, mental health disorders, and the child's need for 7safety and permanence.8(Source: P.A. 102-208, eff. 7-30-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.)